Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB1149.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 3406ww. An insurer that delivers, issues for delivery, or renews in this state a health insurance policy shall provide coverage for a cervical, thoracic, and lumbar epidural steroid injection for acute radiculopathy with chronic pain that impacts the quality of life of an individual as determined by a provider without requiring any additional conditions for coverage.